Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4028
Tangible personal property.

Unless the power of attorney
otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority
with respect to tangible personal property authorizes the agent to:

(1) Demand, buy, receive,
accept as a gift or as security for an extension of credit, or otherwise acquire
or reject ownership or possession of tangible personal property or an interest
in tangible personal property;

(2) Sell; exchange; convey with or without covenants,
representations, or warranties; quitclaim; release; surrender; create a security
interest in; grant options concerning; lease; sublease; or, otherwise dispose
of tangible personal property or an interest in tangible personal property;

(3) Grant a security
interest in tangible personal property or an interest in tangible personal
property as security to borrow money or pay, renew, or extend the time of
payment of a debt of the principal or a debt guaranteed by the principal;

(4) Release, assign,
satisfy, or enforce by litigation or otherwise, a security interest, lien,
or other claim on behalf of the principal, with respect to tangible personal
property or an interest in tangible personal property;

(5) Manage or conserve
tangible personal property or an interest in tangible personal property on
behalf of the principal, including:

(a) Insuring against liability or casualty or other
loss;

(b)
Obtaining or regaining possession of or protecting the property or interest,
by litigation or otherwise;

(c) Paying, assessing, compromising, or contesting
taxes or assessments or applying for and receiving refunds in connection with
taxes or assessments;

(d)
Moving the property from place to place;

(e) Storing the property for hire or on a gratuitous
bailment; and

(f)
Using and making repairs, alterations, or improvements to the property; and

(6) Change the form of
title of an interest in tangible personal property.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 28.